Maryland, session 2026, SB0587.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
19–112.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Center” means a Patient Safety Center designated by the Commission.
(3) “Fund” means the Maryland Patient Safety Center Fund.
(b) (1) On or before December 31, 2025, the Commission shall designate a
Center for the State.
(2) The Center designated under paragraph (1) of this subsection shall
continue to act as the State–designated Center for the duration of the designation period,
as determined by the Commission, if the Center continuously meets the standards and
requirements established by the Commission.
(c) The designated Center shall:
(1) Develop, coordinate, and implement patient safety initiatives across the
State;
(2) Be a model for patient safety innovation and implementation in the
State;
– 1 –

Ch. 626 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(3) Convene health care providers, patients, and families to:
(i) Improve the quality of health care and reduce preventable and
avoidable harm; and
(ii) Provide safe and equitable health care for State citizens; and
(4) Share information relating to best practices among providers and
patients in the State.
(d) (1) There is a Patient Safety Center Fund.
(2) The purpose of the Fund is to subsidize a portion of the costs of the
Center so that the Center may perform the duties described under subsection (c) of this
section.
(3) The Commission shall administer the Fund.
(4) (i) The Fund is a special, nonlapsing fund that is not subject to §
7–302 of the State Finance and Procurement Article.
(ii) The State Treasurer shall hold the Fund separately, and the
Comptroller shall account for the Fund.
(5) The Fund consists of:
(i) Money appropriated in the State budget to the Fund;
(ii) Interest earnings; and
(iii) Any other money from any other source accepted for the benefit
of the Fund.
(6) The Fund may be used only to subsidize a portion of the costs of the
Center so that the Center may perform the duties described under subsection (c) of this
section.
(7) (i) The State Treasurer shall invest the money of the Fund in the
same manner as other State money may be invested.
(ii) Any interest earnings of the Fund shall be credited to the Fund.
(e) (1) (i) For fiscal years 2023 through 2025, the Governor shall include in
the annual budget bill an appropriation of $1,000,000 for the Fund.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 626
(ii) For fiscal year [2026] 2027 and each fiscal year thereafter, the
Governor [may] SHALL include in the annual budget bill an appropriation of $1,000,000
for the Fund.
(2) The Commission may provide an annual grant from the Fund to the
Center in the amount appropriated under paragraph (1) of this subsection, plus any interest
and other income distributed to the Fund.
(3) Expenditures from the Fund may be made only in accordance with the
State budget.
(4) Money expended from the Fund for the Center is supplemental to, and
is not intended to take the place of, funding that otherwise would be appropriated for the
Center.
(f) On or before October 1 each year, the Commission, in conjunction with the
Center, shall report to the Senate Finance Committee and the House Health and
Government Operations Committee, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government
Article, on:
(1) The Center’s statewide activities related to the development,
coordination, and implementation of patient safety initiatives; and
(2) How the Center’s statewide initiatives align with State–designated
priorities.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 26, 2026.
– 3 –